District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-907.03

Grant Award Committee.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 703
as added June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-123, § 2(c), 39 DCR 3202
Sept. 26, 1992, D.C. Law 9-155, § 2(c), 39 DCR 5679
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 809(b), 42 DCR 3684

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-573.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 804(b) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 10-253, title VIII, § 804(b) ( 42 DCR 721), eff. March 23, 1995, provided for the temporary repeal of this section. Title XIII, § 1301(b) of D.C. Law 10-253 provided for expiration “on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Act of 1995, whichever occurs first.”